Hawaii statutes.
§571-87 Appointment of counsel and guardian
ad litem; compensation. (a) When it appears to a judge that a person
requesting the appointment of counsel satisfies the requirements of chapter 802
for determination of indigency, or the court in its discretion appoints counsel
under chapters [587A] and 346, part X, or that a person requires appointment of
a guardian ad litem, the judge shall appoint counsel or a guardian ad litem to
represent the person at all stages of the proceedings, including appeal, if any.
Appointed counsel and the guardian ad litem shall receive reasonable
compensation for necessary expenses, including travel, the amount of which
shall be determined by the court, and reasonable fees pursuant to subsections
(b) and (c). All of these expenses and fees shall be certified by the court
and paid upon vouchers approved by the judiciary and warrants drawn by the
comptroller.

(b) The court shall determine the amount of
reasonable compensation paid to appointed counsel and guardian ad litem, based
on the following rates:

(1) $90 an hour for in-court services provided by an
attorney licensed to practice law in the State; and

(2) $60 an hour for:

(A) Out-of-court services provided by an
attorney licensed to practice law in the State; and

(B) All services provided by a person who is
not an attorney licensed to practice law in the State, whether performed
in-court or out-of-court.

(c) The maximum allowable fee shall not exceed
the following schedule:

(1) Cases arising under chapters [587A] and 346, part
X:

(A). Predisposition $3,000;

(B). Postdisposition review hearing $1,000;

(2) Cases arising under chapters 560, 571, 580, and

584................ $3,000.

Payments in excess of any maximum provided for
under paragraphs (1) and (2) may be made whenever the court in which the
representation was rendered certifies, based upon representations of
extraordinary circumstances, attested to by the applicant, that the amount of
the excess payment is necessary to provide fair compensation in light of those circumstances,
and the payment is approved by the administrative judge of that court.

(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude the
judiciary from contracting for court-appointed counsel and guardian ad litem
services pursuant to chapter 103D and based on contract amounts guided by the
rates in subsection (b). [L 1987, c 376, §1; am L 1989, c 381, §4; am L 1990, c
234, §8; am L 2007, c 218, §1; am L 2008, c 201, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next